Florida, session 2026, HB617.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 193.6245, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
193.6245 Assessment of property; changes or improvements
for resistance to wind damage.—
(1) As used in this section, the term "changes or
improvements made to improve the property's resistance to wind
damage" includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:
(a) Improving the strength of the roof deck attachment.
(b) Creating a secondary water barrier to prevent water
intrusion.
(c) Installing wind-resistant shingles.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb617-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 617 2026
(d) Installing gable-end bracing.
(e) Reinforcing roof-to-wall connections.
(f) Installing storm shutters.
(g) Installing opening protections.
(2) In determining the assessed value of real property
used for residential purposes, any increase in just value of a
property which is attributable to changes or improvements made
to improve the property's resistance to wind damage may not be
considered.
(3) This section applies to changes or improvements made
to improve the property's resistance to wind damage made on or
after January 1, 2027.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb617-00